Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7442
Repackage, defined.

Repackage means repackaging or otherwise changing the container, wrapper, or labeling of a prescription drug to facilitate the wholesale distribution of such drug.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 16.